Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-524
Grounds; abandonment; sale; time for hearing.

Said application and proceeding shall stand for hearing before the district court at any time after issue joined therein; or if no objection has been filed, then any time after the time for filing objections shall have expired, satisfactory proof having been made to the court of the publication of the notice required by section 12-522.

Laws 1907, c. 27, § 4, p. 148;

R.S.1913, § 691;

C.S.1922, § 600;

C.S.1929, § 13-513;

R.S.1943, § 12-524.